Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.498] LICENSURE OF EMERGENCY RESTORATION PROFESSIONALS AND EMERGENCY RESTORATION COMPANIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (c) "Direct supervision" means supervision by an individual who is physically present at on-site activities and is immediately available to direct, instruct, and oversee the activities of other individuals. new text end new text begin (d) "Emergency restoration services" means restoration services performed at a residential or commercial building in response to sudden, unanticipated damage to the building caused by water, fire, smoke, or a similar catastrophic event. Emergency restoration services include but are not limited to: water extraction and structural drying; fire damage clean-up and soot removal; removal of damaged carpet, flooring, drywall, and other building materials; and deodorization and smoke odor removal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Licensure of emergency restoration professionals. new text end new text begin This subdivision is effective January 1, 2028. Except as provided in subdivision 6, an individual who performs emergency restoration services for compensation in this state must be licensed under this section as an emergency restoration professional. An emergency restoration professional license is not transferrable. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Practice standards. new text end new text begin A licensed emergency restoration professional must: new text end new text begin (1) perform water damage restoration in accordance with the American National Standards Institute/Institute of Inspection, Cleaning, and Restoration Certification (ANSI/IICRC) S500 Standard for Professional Water Damage Restoration, or its successor publication; and new text end new text begin (2) perform fire damage restoration in accordance with the ANSI/IICRC S700 Standard for Professional Fire and Smoke Damage Restoration, or its successor publication. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Initial licensure for emergency restoration professionals. new text end new text begin (a) An individual seeking licensure as an emergency restoration professional must apply to the commissioner on a form and in a manner specified by the commissioner and must include the fee required under subdivision 10 with the application and proof of the certification required under paragraph (b). An emergency restoration professional license is valid for one year from the date of issuance or renewal. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for initial licensure, the individual must hold active certification in water damage restoration, fire damage restoration, and structural drying from the Institute of Inspection, Cleaning, and Restoration Certification or from another certification organization approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin License renewal for emergency restoration professionals. new text end new text begin (a) At least 30 days before an individual's emergency restoration professional license expires, an individual seeking to renew the emergency restoration professional license must apply for license renewal on a form and in a manner specified by the commissioner and must include the fee required under subdivision 10 with the application and proof of the certification required under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for license renewal, the individual must hold active certification that meets the requirements under subdivision 4, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemptions from licensure as an emergency restoration professional. new text end new text begin An individual is not required to be licensed as an emergency restoration professional if the individual: new text end new text begin (1) is employed by an emergency restoration company and performs emergency restoration services under the direct supervision of an emergency restoration professional licensed under this section; new text end new text begin (2) is performing routine cleaning, general remodeling, or construction services unrelated to damage caused by water, fire, smoke, or a similar catastrophic event; or new text end new text begin (3) is reconstructing, repairing, or replacing building materials or systems after emergency restoration services are completed. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Licensure of emergency restoration companies. new text end new text begin Effective January 1, 2028, a person that employs or contracts with one or more individuals to perform emergency restoration services for compensation in this state must be licensed under this section as an emergency restoration company. An emergency restoration company license is not transferrable. A licensed emergency restoration company must employ or contract with at least one responsible individual who is an emergency restoration professional licensed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Initial licensure for emergency restoration companies. new text end new text begin A person seeking licensure as an emergency restoration company must apply to the commissioner on a form and in a manner specified by the commissioner and must include the fee required under subdivision 10 with the application. An emergency restoration company license is valid for one year from the date of issuance or renewal. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin License renewal for emergency restoration companies. new text end new text begin At least 30 days before an emergency restoration company's license expires, a person seeking to renew the emergency restoration company license must apply for license renewal on a form and in a manner specified by the commissioner and must include the fee required under subdivision 10 with the application. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must charge the following fees under this section: new text end new text begin (1) emergency restoration professional initial licensure and license renewal, $150 per year; and new text end new text begin (2) emergency restoration company initial licensure and license renewal, $100 per year. new text end new text begin (b) Fees collected under this section: new text end new text begin (1) are not refundable; and new text end new text begin (2) must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state government special revenue fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The commissioner must enforce this section under sections 144.989 to 144.993. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 144.99, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Remedies available. The provisions of chapters 103I and 157 and sections 115.71 to 115.77; 144.12, subdivision 1, clauses (1), (2), (5), (6), (10), (12), (13), (14), and (15); 144.1201 to 144.1204; 144.121; 144.1215; 144.1222; 144.35; 144.381 to 144.385; 144.411 to 144.417; 144.495; new text begin 144.498; new text end 144.71 to 144.74; 144.9501 to 144.9512; 144.97 to 144.98; 144.992; 147.037, subdivision 1b, paragraph (d); 326.70 to 326.785; 327.10 to 327.131; and 327.14 to 327.28 and all rules, orders, stipulation agreements, settlements, compliance agreements, licenses, registrations, certificates, and permits adopted or issued by the department or under any other law now in force or later enacted for the preservation of public health may, in addition to provisions in other statutes, be enforced under this section. Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LICENSURE OF EMERGENCY RESTORATION PROFESSIONALS AND EMERGENCY RESTORATION COMPANIES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the state government special revenue fund to the commissioner of health for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 144.498. new text end